Utah statutes.
59-2-215.   Chief executive officer of state agency to furnish lists of sold lands.

On or before January 15 of each year the chief executive officer of any agency of the state shall make and transmit to the commission certified lists of lands sold by the state for which certificates of purchase or patents have been issued during the preceding year, giving a description by divisions or subdivisions or lots and blocks, together with the names of the purchasers or patentees, and in the case of lands sold by the state upon contract the amount of the purchase price and the total amount paid or due on the preceding January 1.

